Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 189 Traffic Regulations — Vehicle Equipment and Storage
189.515.
Restrictions on operation of all-terrain vehicles. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

As used in this section, “federal all-terrain vehicle standards” means the all-terrain vehicle standards set forth by the American National Standards Institute/Specialty Vehicle Institute of America and incorporated by reference in 16 C.F.R. sec. 1420.3, to the extent those standards are applicable.

Except for vehicles authorized to operate on a public highway as of July 15, 1998, and except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, a person shall not operate an all-terrain vehicle upon any public highway or roadway or upon the right-of-way of any public highway or roadway.

A person shall not operate an all-terrain vehicle on private property without the consent of the landowner, tenant, or individual responsible for the property.

A person shall not operate an all-terrain vehicle on public property unless the governmental agency responsible for the property has approved the use of all-terrain vehicles.

Except for vehicles authorized to operate on a public highway, a person sixteen (16) years of age or older operating an all-terrain vehicle on public property shall wear approved protective headgear, in the manner prescribed by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, at all times that the vehicle is in motion. The approved headgear requirement shall not apply when the operator of any all-terrain vehicle is engaged in:

Farm or agriculture related activities;

Mining or mining exploration activities;

Logging activities;

Any other business, commercial, or industrial activity;

Use of that vehicle on private property; or

The crossing of a public roadway with a posted speed limit of fifty-five (55) miles per hour or less. The crossing of a public roadway outlined in this paragraph shall be in compliance with subsection (7)(a) of this section.

A parent or legal guardian of a minor who is under the age of six (6) shall not knowingly allow that person to operate an all-terrain vehicle.

A person under the age of sixteen (16) years shall not operate an all-terrain vehicle except under direct parental supervision.

A person under the age of sixteen (16) years, when operating or riding as a passenger on an all-terrain vehicle, shall wear approved protective headgear, in the manner prescribed by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, at all times that the vehicle is in motion.

A parent or guardian of a minor who is under the age of sixteen (16), or who does not possess an instruction permit, an intermediate license, or an operator’s license, shall not knowingly allow that person to carry a passenger while operating an all-terrain vehicle.

A parent or guardian of a minor under the age of sixteen (16) shall not knowingly allow that person to operate an all-terrain vehicle in violation of the age restriction warning label affixed by the manufacturer as required by the federal all-terrain vehicle standards.

Except for off-highway vehicles described in KRS

189.281

, a person may operate an all-terrain vehicle on any two (2) lane public highway in order to cross the highway. In crossing the highway under this paragraph, the operator shall cross the highway at as close to a ninety (90) degree angle as is practical and safe, and shall not travel on the highway for more than two-tenths (2/10) of a mile.

A person may operate an all-terrain vehicle on any two (2) lane public highway, if the operator is engaged in farm or agricultural related activities, construction, road maintenance, or snow removal.

The Transportation Cabinet may designate, and a city or county government may designate, those public highways, segments of public highways, and adjoining rights-of-way of public highways under its jurisdiction where all-terrain vehicles that are prohibited may be operated.

A person operating an all-terrain vehicle on a public highway under this subsection shall possess a valid operator’s license.

A person operating an all-terrain vehicle on a public highway under this subsection shall comply with all applicable traffic regulations.

A person shall not operate an all-terrain vehicle under this subsection unless the all-terrain vehicle has at least one (1) headlight and two (2) taillights, which shall be illuminated at all times the vehicle is in operation.

A person operating an all-terrain vehicle under this subsection shall restrict the operation to daylight hours, except when engaged in snow removal or emergency road maintenance.

It shall be unlawful for a person to remove from an all-terrain vehicle the manufacturer age restriction warning label required by the federal all-terrain vehicle standards.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 400, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 47, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 460, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 180, § 8, effective July 12, 2006; 2014, ch. 86, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 64, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 186, § 7, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). Subsection (7)(a) of this statute was amended by Section 7 of 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 186. Section 9 of that Act provides that “Sec- tions 6 to 8 of this Act are part of a pilot program and shall sunset on July 1, 2024.”

189.517.
Mini-truck — Definition — Criteria for operation — Permitted and prohibited uses.

As used in this section, “mini-truck” means a lightweight Japanese kei class utility vehicle.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, a person shall not operate a mini-truck upon any public highway or roadway or upon the right-of-way of any public highway or roadway.

A person shall not operate a mini-truck on private property without the consent of the landowner, tenant, or individual responsible for the property.

A person shall not operate a mini-truck on public property unless the governmental agency responsible for the property has approved the use of mini-trucks.

A person may operate a mini-truck on any two (2) lane public highway in order to cross the highway. In crossing the highway under this paragraph, the operator shall cross the highway at as close to a ninety (90) degree angle as is practical and safe, and shall not travel on the highway for more than two-tenths (2/10) of a mile.

A person may operate a mini-truck on any two (2) lane public highway if the operator is engaged in farm or agricultural-related activities, construction, road maintenance, or snow removal.

The Transportation Cabinet may designate, and a city or county government may designate, those public highways, segments of public highways, and adjoining rights-of-way of public highways under its jurisdiction where mini-trucks that are prohibited may be operated.

A person operating a mini-truck on a public highway under this subsection shall possess a valid operator’s license.

A person operating a mini-truck on a public highway under this subsection shall comply with all applicable traffic regulations.

A person shall not operate a mini-truck under this subsection unless the mini-truck has at least two (2) headlights and two (2) taillights, which shall be illuminated at all times the mini-truck is in operation.

A person operating a mini-truck under this subsection shall restrict the operation to daylight hours, except when engaged in snow removal or emergency road maintenance.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 61, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

189.520.
Operating vehicle not a motor vehicle while under influence of intoxicants or substance which may impair driving ability prohibited — Presumptions concerning intoxication.

No person under the influence of intoxicating beverages or any substance which may impair one’s driving ability shall operate a vehicle that is not a motor vehicle anywhere in this state.

No peace officer or State Police officer shall fail to enforce rigidly this section.

In any criminal prosecution for a violation of subsection (1) of this section, wherein the defendant is charged with having operated a vehicle which is not a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating beverages, the alcohol concentration, as defined in KRS

189A.005

, in the defendant’s blood as determined at the time of making an analysis of his blood, urine, or breath, shall give rise to the following presumptions:

If there was an alcohol concentration of less than 0.05, it shall be presumed that the defendant was not under the influence of alcohol;

If there was an alcohol concentration of 0.05 or greater but less than 0.08, such fact shall not constitute a presumption that the defendant either was or was not under the influence of alcohol, but such fact may be considered, together with other competent evidence, in determining the guilt or innocence of the defendant; and

If there was an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more, it shall be presumed that the defendant was under the influence of alcohol.

The provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall not be construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the question of whether the defendant was under the influence of intoxicating beverages.

History.

2739g-34, 2739g-34a, 2739g-34b: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 209; 1954, ch. 74; 1958, ch. 126, § 24; 1968, ch. 184, § 7; 1984, ch. 165, § 18, effective July 13, 1984; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 19, effective July 1, 1991; 2000, ch. 467, § 12, effective October 1, 2000.

189.530.
Providing motor vehicle to person intoxicated or under influence of substance which may impair driving ability — Possession of open alcoholic beverage container in a motor vehicle prohibited — Exceptions — Definitions — Election of offenses to prosecute.

No person shall provide a motor vehicle to another to operate upon a highway, knowing that the other person is in an intoxicated condition, or under the influence of any substance which may impair one’s driving ability.

A person is guilty of possession of an open alcoholic beverage container in a motor vehicle, when he or she has in his or her possession an open alcoholic beverage container in the passenger area of a motor vehicle located on a public highway or on the right-of-way of a public highway. However, nothing in this section shall prohibit the possession of an open alcoholic beverage container by an individual who is strictly a passenger and not the driver, in the passenger area of a motor vehicle maintained or used primarily for the transportation of persons for compensation, such as buses, taxis, and limousines, or in a recreational vehicle, motor home, or motor coach.

For purposes of this section, “alcoholic beverage” means:

Beer, ale, porter, stout, and other similar fermented beverages including sake or similar products of any name or description containing one-half of one percent (0.5%) or more of alcohol by volume, brewed or produced from malt, wholly or in part, or from any substitute therefor;

Wine of not less than one-half of one percent (0.5%) of alcohol by volume; or

Distilled spirits which is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, ethanol, or spirits of wine in any form including all dilutions and mixtures thereof from whatever source or by whatever process produced.

For the purposes of this section, “open alcoholic beverage container” means any bottle, can, or other receptacle that contains any amount of alcoholic beverage, and:

Is open or has a broken seal; or

The contents of which are partially removed.

For the purposes of this section, “passenger area” means the area designed to seat the driver and the passengers while the motor vehicle is in operation and any area that is readily accessible to the driver or a passenger while in their seating positions, including the glove compartment. Passenger area does not include possession of an open alcoholic beverage container in a locked glove compartment, or behind the last upright seat or in an area not normally occupied by the driver or a passenger in a motor vehicle that is not equipped with a trunk.

For the purpose of this section, “public highway” or “right-of-way of a public highway” means the entire width between and immediately adjacent to the boundary lines of every way publicly maintained when any part thereof is open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel.

No person shall, as a result of a single course of conduct, be tried for or convicted of a violation of this section and a violation of KRS

222.202

or

525.100

. The attorney for the Commonwealth shall elect under which statute to proceed. A conviction, decision not to prosecute, or dismissal of charges under any of these statutes shall operate as a bar to prosecution under any other of these statutes for offenses arising out of the same course of conduct.

History.

1376r-2: amend. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 19, effective July 13, 1984; 2000, ch. 467, § 18, effective October 1, 2000.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Renting motor vehicle to unlicensed persons prohibited, KRS

186.630

.

189.540.
Regulations for school buses — Operator required to have commercial driver’s license with school bus endorsement.

The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to govern the design and operation of all Kentucky school buses and to govern the operation of district-owned passenger vehicles transporting students under KRS 156.153(2). The board shall, with the advice and aid of the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Transportation Cabinet, enforce the administrative regulations governing the operation of all school buses whether owned by a school district or privately contracted and all district-owned passenger vehicles transporting students under KRS 156.153(2). The regulations covering the operation shall by reference be made a part of any contract with a school district. Every school district and private contractor referred to under this subsection shall be subject to those regulations.

Any employee of any school district who violates any of the administrative regulations in any contract executed on behalf of a school district shall be subject to removal from office. Any person operating a school bus under contract with a school district who fails to comply with any of the administrative regulations shall be guilty of breach of contract and the contract shall be canceled after proper notice and a hearing by the responsible officers of such school district.

Any person who operates a school bus shall be required to possess a commercial driver’s license issued pursuant to KRS

281A.170

with a school bus endorsement as described in KRS

281A.175

.

History.

2739g-69m: corrected, Acts. 1958, ch. 126, § 24; 1988, ch. 262, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 455, § 32, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 476, § 609, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 216, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 362, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 22, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 165, § 9, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 209, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/13/90). The Act amending this section prevails over the repeal and reenactment in House Bill 940, Acts Ch. 476, pursuant to Section 653(1) of Acts Ch. 476.

(6/17/78). This section was amended by 1978 Ky. Acts chs. 83 and 434, part of which are in conflict and cannot be compiled together. Effect has been given to all provisions except for the conflicting provision in subsection (3), in which the later amendment by 1978 Ky. Acts ch. 434, sec. 7, prevails.

189.550.
Vehicles used for transporting children to stop at railroad crossings.

Operators of all buses and motor vehicles used for transporting children shall stop their vehicles before crossing any railroad when tracks are at the same level of the roadway. The stop shall be made not less than fifteen (15) feet nor more than fifty (50) feet from the nearest track over which the highway crosses, except where the crossing is protected by gates or a flagman employed by the railroad. After making the stop, the operator shall open the service door and carefully look in each direction and listen for approaching trains or other on-track equipment before proceeding. If visibility is impaired at the required distance for stopping under this section, the operator may allow the vehicle to slowly roll forward for the purpose of gaining the visibility necessary to safely cross the railroad tracks.

HISTORY:

1376r-10: amend. Acts. 1960, ch. 123, § 4; 1988, ch. 262, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; 2003, ch. 147, § 1, effective March 18, 2003; 2018 ch. 101, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

189.560.
Railroad crossings — Duties of motor vehicle operators and commercial drivers — Railroad’s liability for death or injury.

The operator of a vehicle shall stop and remain standing at a railroad grade crossing when any of the following conditions exist:

A visible electric or mechanical signal device warns of the immediate approach of a railroad train or other on-track equipment;

A crossing gate is lowered warning of the immediate approach or passage of a railroad train or other on-track equipment;

An approaching train or other on-track equipment is visible and in hazardous proximity; or

A human flagman signals the approach or passage of a train or other on-track equipment.

In addition to subsection (1) of this section, a person who holds or is required to hold a CDL as defined in KRS

281A.010

and is driving a commercial motor vehicle shall:

Slow down and check that the railroad tracks are clear of an approaching train;

Stop and remain standing at a railroad grade crossing if the railroad tracks are not clear;

Maintain sufficient space to drive completely through the railroad grade crossing without stopping; and

Negotiate a railroad grade crossing only with sufficient undercarriage clearance.

Whenever the tracks of any railroad or interurban railway over which trains or cars are regularly operated cross a state maintained highway at grade, the cabinet may designate that crossing as “unsafe,” and no operator of any vehicle shall cross the crossing without first bringing his vehicle to a full stop no closer than a marked stop line or fifteen (15) feet, nor more than thirty (30) feet, from the nearest rail of the tracks.

At crossings designated “unsafe,” the cabinet shall place and maintain on each side of the tracks on the right side of the highway, at the marked stopping position, or, if the stopping position is not marked, on the pavement not more than twenty-five (25) feet in advance of the track, an octagonal shape sign of a type and size currently approved for use by the cabinet bearing the word “Stop” in white letters not less than ten (10) inches in height.

The cabinet shall install the signs described in subsection (3) of this section, within sixty (60) days after the crossing is designated unsafe.

Subsections (3) to (5) of this section shall not apply to grade crossings at which have been constructed and maintained gates, electric warning signals, or other automatic audible signals, or which are protected by watchmen.

The failure to observe subsections (3) to (6) of this section shall not change the liability of any railroad or interurban railway in the trial of any civil case against the railroad or interurban railway for death or injuries, to person or property.

If subsection (7) of this section is declared unconstitutional, then subsections (3) to (8) of this section shall be ineffective.

HISTORY:

2739g-69w, 4353b-1 to 4353b-5: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 65, § 5; 1970, ch. 86, § 1; 1992, ch. 229, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 2006, ch. 173, § 21, effective July 12, 2006; 2013, ch. 21, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 101, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

189.561.
Investigation of certain public grade crossings not equipped with gates — Results — Costs.

The cabinet shall investigate any public grade crossing not equipped with gates, with an average daily traffic of four thousand (4,000) or more, at which two (2) or more accidents involving a train and a vehicle traversing the crossing of a railroad and a highway have occurred in a consecutive five (5) year period, beginning January 1, 1986. The cabinet shall not consider nonfatal accidents caused by mechanical failure of the motor vehicle; accidents in which the operator of the highway motor vehicle was in violation of the provisions of KRS Chapter 189A; or other nonwarning signal related cause as set forth by the cabinet in an administrative regulation. If the cabinet installed active warning devices under its normal crossing safety improvement program since January 1, 1986, the five (5) year period for the determination of accidents shall begin at the time of this installation. The cabinet shall request written comments from the affected local government prior to reaching a decision on a particular crossing. After receiving a report from the affected local government supporting the installation of gates, the cabinet, utilizing matching funds available from the Federal Highway Administration’s rail/highway grade crossing safety program, shall program the installation of gates at the crossing. Locations which do not receive a favorable report from the affected local government shall be reconsidered at the time of the next update of the five (5) year accident period.

The cost of installing gates shall be the responsibility of the cabinet and railroad in accordance with KRS

277.065

and shall not be charged to any unit of local government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 229, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 195, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

189.562.
Duty of railroad company when warning device incorrectly remains activated.

If a warning device at a grade crossing is activated, for a period of thirty (30) minutes or more, in the absence of an approaching train, due to track maintenance or train movements in the vicinity, and the railroad company responsible is unable to disengage the warning device, then the company shall position a flagman at the affected intersection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 229, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

189.565.
Operator of motor vehicle used in transporting inflammable liquids or explosives to stop vehicle at railroad crossings — Exceptions.

The operator of any motor vehicle used in the transportation of inflammable liquids or explosives shall stop such motor vehicle before crossing at grade the main track of any railroad or interurban electric railway, except where the crossing is a guarded crossing protected by gates or a flag controlled crossing or operated by an employee of the railroad or interurban company. The stop shall be made no closer than a marked stop line or fifteen (15) feet, nor more than thirty (30) feet, from the nearest track to be crossed. After making the stop, the operator shall look carefully in each direction and shall not start his vehicle until he has ascertained that no cars, trains, or other on-track equipment are approaching in either direction.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 35, § 1, effective May 18, 1956; 2006, ch. 173, § Section 22, effective July 12, 2006; 2018 ch. 101, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

189.570.
Pedestrians.

Pedestrians shall obey the instruction of any official traffic control devices specifically applicable to them, unless otherwise directed by a police officer or other officially designated persons.

Pedestrians shall be subject to traffic and pedestrian control signals as provided in KRS

189.231

and

189.338

.

At all other places, pedestrians shall be accorded the privileges and shall be subject to the restrictions stated in this chapter.

When traffic control signals are not in place or in operation the operator of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way, slowing down or stopping if need be to so yield, to a pedestrian crossing the roadway upon which the vehicle is traveling, or when the pedestrian is approaching so closely from the opposite half of the roadway as to be in danger.

Whenever any vehicle is stopped at a marked crosswalk or at any unmarked crosswalk at an intersection, to permit a pedestrian to cross the roadway, the operator of any other vehicle approaching from the rear shall not overtake and pass the stopped vehicle.

Every pedestrian crossing a roadway at a point other than within a marked crosswalk or within an unmarked crosswalk at an intersection shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

Any pedestrian crossing a roadway at a point where a pedestrian tunnel or overhead pedestrian crossing has been provided shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

Between adjacent intersections within the city limits of every city at which traffic control signals are in operation, pedestrians shall not cross at any place except in a marked crosswalk.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this subsection or the provisions of any local ordinance, every operator of a vehicle shall exercise due care to avoid colliding with any pedestrian and shall give warning by sounding the horn when necessary and shall exercise proper precaution upon observing a child or an obviously confused or incapacitated person upon a roadway.

No vehicle shall at any time be driven through or within a safety zone.

The operator of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian on a sidewalk.

No pedestrian shall suddenly leave a curb or other place of safety and walk or run into the path of a vehicle which is so close as to constitute an immediate hazard.

No pedestrian shall cross a roadway intersection diagonally unless authorized by official traffic control devices; and, when authorized to cross diagonally, pedestrians shall cross only in accordance with the official traffic control devices pertaining to such crossing movements.

Pedestrians shall move, whenever practicable, upon the right half of crosswalks.

Where a sidewalk is provided and its use is practicable, it shall be unlawful for any pedestrian to walk along and upon an adjacent roadway.

Where a sidewalk is not available, any pedestrian walking along and upon a highway shall walk only on a shoulder, as far as practicable from the edge of the roadway.

Where neither a sidewalk nor a shoulder is available, any pedestrian walking on or along a highway shall walk as near as practicable to an outside edge of the roadway, and, if on a two-way roadway shall walk only on the left side of the roadway.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any pedestrian upon a roadway shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

A pedestrian who is under the influence of alcohol or any kind of drug to a degree which renders himself a hazard shall not walk or be upon a highway except on a sidewalk.

No pedestrian shall enter or remain upon any bridge or approach thereto beyond the bridge signal, gate, or barrier, after a bridge operation signal indication has been given.

No pedestrian shall pass through, around, over, or under any crossing gate or barrier at a railroad grade crossing or bridge while such gate or barrier is closed or is being opened or closed.

No person shall stand in a roadway for the purpose of soliciting a ride.

No person shall stand on a roadway for the purpose of soliciting employment or business from the occupant of any vehicle.

No person shall stand on a highway for the purpose of soliciting contributions unless such soliciting is designated by the presence of a traffic control device or warning signal or an emergency vehicle or public safety vehicle as defined in KRS

189.910

making use of the flashing, rotating or oscillating red, blue, or yellow lights on such devices or vehicles.

No person shall stand on or in proximity to a street or highway for the purpose of soliciting the watching or guarding of any vehicle while parked or about to be parked on a street or highway.

Upon the immediate approach of an emergency vehicle equipped with, and operating, one (1) or more flashing, rotating, or oscillating red or blue lights, visible under normal conditions from a distance of 500 feet to the front of such vehicle, and the operator of which is giving audible signal by siren, exhaust whistle, or bell, every pedestrian shall yield the right-of-way to the emergency vehicle.

This section shall not relieve the operator of an emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway nor from the duty to exercise due care to avoid colliding with any pedestrian.

History.

2739g-69q to 2739g-69v: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 46, § 8, effective June 17, 1978.

189.575.
Yielding right-of-way to blind pedestrian.

The operator of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to any blind pedestrian carrying a clearly visible white cane or accompanied by an assistance dog.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 48, §§ 1 to 3; 1978, ch. 46, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 2002, ch. 94, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

189.580.
Duty in case of accident — Movement of vehicle from roadway after accident — Removal of vehicles obstructing roadway — Exemptions — Costs of removal recoverable.

The operator of any vehicle, whose vehicle, vehicle load, or vehicle equipment which is involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person or resulting only in damage to a vehicle or other property which is driven or attended by any person, shall immediately stop and ascertain the extent of the injury or damage and render reasonable assistance, including the carrying, or making of arrangements for the carrying, of such person to a physician, surgeon, or hospital for medical or surgical treatment if it is apparent that such treatment is necessary, or if such carrying is requested by the injured person. The operator or person having or assuming authority of the operator, or ownership of the vehicle, shall give the occupant of the vehicle, or person struck, if requested, the registration number of the vehicle, if any, and also the names and addresses of the owner, the occupants, and operator. The total names need not exceed five (5) in number.

If an accident that occurs on an interstate highway or parkway or any on-ramp or off-ramp thereto does not involve death, known or visible injury, or the transportation of hazardous material, the operator shall move the vehicle off the roadway to a place as close to the accident scene as practicable without obstructing traffic as soon as the vehicle can be moved without the risk of further injury or damage. The operator or person having or assuming authority of the operator, or ownership of the vehicle, shall give any other person involved in the accident, if requested, the registration number of the vehicle, if any, and also the names and addresses of the owner, the occupants, and the operator of his or her vehicle, and insurance information for the vehicle.

The operator of any vehicle which collides with or is involved in an accident with any vehicle or other property which is unattended resulting in any damage to such other vehicle or property shall immediately stop as close to the accident scene as possible without obstructing traffic and shall then and there either locate and notify the operator or owner of such vehicle or other property of his or her name, address, and the registration number of the vehicle he or she is driving or shall attach securely in a conspicuous place in or on such vehicle or other property a written notice giving his or her name, address, and the registration number of the vehicle he or she is driving, or shall file a report with the local police department.

If the operator of a vehicle is unable to move a vehicle off the roadway under the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the operator or owner may permit any person who possesses a valid operator’s license or proper class of commercial driver’s license to move the vehicle as provided in this section.

Except as provided for in subsection (5) of this section, a peace officer or safety officer may remove or cause to be removed from the roadway of an interstate highway or parkway or any on-ramp or off-ramp thereto, without consent of the owner or operator, any vehicle, cargo, or other property which is obstructing the roadway, creating or aggravating an emergency situation, or otherwise endangering public safety. Any vehicle, cargo, or other property obstructing the roadway of an interstate highway or parkway shall be removed by the most expeditious means available to clear the obstruction, giving due regard to the protection of the property removed.

In accidents that involve fatalities or known or visible injuries, the removal provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall apply only after all medical assistance, fire supervision, and site investigation have been completed.

The removal provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall not apply if an accident involves, or is believed to involve, a release of hazardous materials.

The operator of a vehicle involved in an accident on a highway in this state which results in a fatality or a known or visible injury to a person or damage to a vehicle which renders the vehicle inoperable shall immediately notify a public safety answering point, law enforcement agency, or law enforcement officer having jurisdiction, if the operator is physically capable of doing so and has in his or her possession a functioning communications device with which to do so.

In the event an operator fails to notify or is incapable of notifying a public safety answering point, law enforcement agency, or law enforcement officer having jurisdiction, the responsibility for reporting the accident within a reasonable amount of time shall rest with the owner of the vehicle or any occupant of the vehicle at the time of the accident, if the owner or occupant is physically capable of doing so, has in his or her possession a functioning communications device with which to do so, and, in the case of the owner, knows of the motor vehicle accident. A law enforcement officer having jurisdiction shall investigate the accident and file a written report of the accident with the officer’s agency.

The operator of a vehicle involved in an accident on a highway in this state resulting in injury to or death of any person or in which total property damage of five hundred dollars ($500) or more is sustained, and in which an investigation is not conducted by a law enforcement officer, shall file a written report of the accident with the Department of Kentucky State Police within ten (10) days of the occurrence of the accident upon forms provided by the department.

Any agency, including the Commonwealth, that removes property from the roadway may intervene in any civil action arising from the accident to recover any costs expended. An owner of real property shall not be liable for the costs of removal under this section of trees, fences, structures, or other debris which fall into the roadway as a result of fire, severe weather, or other casualty.

History.

2739g-53, 2739g-69x, 2739g-69y: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 151, § 2; 1958, ch. 126, § 24; 1972, ch. 64, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(10); 1976, ch. 133, § 23; 1978, ch. 83, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 434, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 94, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 2006, ch. 109, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 110, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 210, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/17/78). This section was amended by 1978 Ky. Acts chs. 83 and 434, part of which are in conflict and cannot be compiled together. Effect has been given to all provisions except for the conflicting provision in subsection (3), in which the later amendment by 1978 Ky. Acts ch. 434, sec. 7, prevails.

189.590.
Coroners to report deaths.

Every coroner or other official performing a coroner’s functions shall, on or before the tenth day of each month, report in writing to the State Police the death of any person occurring within his county during the preceding calendar month as the result of an accident involving a motor vehicle, and the circumstances of the accident.

History.

2739g-69aa: corrected, Acts 1958, ch. 126, § 24.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Oberst, Recent Developments in Torts; Decisions of the Court of Appeals at the 1956-57 Terms, Contributory Negligence, 46 Ky. L.J. 193 (1958).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Answer Denying Vicarious Liability under KRS

189.590

, Alleging Use Not Permissive, Form 135.17.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Bailment, § 133.00.

189.600.
State police to supply accident report forms. [Repealed.]

189.610.
Accident reports confidential. [Repealed.]

189.620.
State police to tabulate reports and publish statistics. [Repealed.]

189.630.
City may require accident reports. [Repealed.]